Maryland, session 2025, SB0095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
SUBTITLE 21. PLAYGROUND SAFETY.
5–2101.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PLAYGROUND” MEANS A PUBLIC OUTDOOR RECREATION
AREA FOR CHILDREN EQUIPPED WITH ONE OR MORE PLAY STRUCTURES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0095*

SENATE BILL 95
5–2102.
(A) EACH UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND MAINTENANCE OF A PLAYGROUND SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
PLAYGROUND IS CONSTRUCTED AND MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST
RECENT PUBLICATION OF:
(1) THE PUBLIC PLAYGROUND SAFETY HANDBOOK, PUBLISHED BY
THE U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION;
(2) THE STANDARD CONSUMER SAFETY PERFORMANCE
SPECIFICATION FOR PLAYGROUND EQUIPMENT FOR PUBLIC USE, PUBLISHED BY
THE AMERICAN NATIONAL STANDARDS INSTITUTE; AND
(3) THE STANDARD SPECIFICATION FOR IMPACT ATTENUATION OF
SURFACING MATERIALS WITHIN THE USE ZONE OF PLAYGROUND EQUIPMENT,
PUBLISHED BY THE AMERICAN NATIONAL STANDARDS INSTITUTE.
(B) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS, EACH UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT RESPONSIBLE FOR A PLAYGROUND SHALL INSPECT THE
PLAYGROUND TO EVALUATE COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) AFTER COMPLETION OF EACH INSPECTION CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL KEEP AN INSPECTION RECORD, INCLUDING A WRITTEN PLAN
TO ADDRESS ANY SAFETY HAZARDS DISCOVERED DURING THE INSPECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.